Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1289] MINNESOTA SOLAR POLLINATOR PROGRAM SPECIAL LICENSE PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must issue solar pollinator program special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $60 annually to the Board of Water and Soil Resources pollinator account in section 103B.101, subdivision 19, and contributes a minimum of $25 annually to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to fund the College of Food, Agricultural and Natural Resource Sciences research and outreach centers' work on applied agrivoltaics; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin (b) The solar pollinator program plate application must indicate that the annual contributions specified under paragraph (a), clause (4), are the minimum contributions necessary to receive the plate and that the applicant may make additional contributions to those accounts. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design in consultation with the Board of Water and Soil Resources and other groups interested in solar pollinator and agrivoltaic habitats and practices. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), to bear the special plate; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contribution and fees. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (4), must be paid, as applicable, to: (1) the commissioner and credited to the Board of Water and Soil Resources pollinator account established in section 103B.101, subdivision 19; and (2) the commissioner of agriculture and credited to the pollinator research account in the agricultural fund established in section 18B.051. The other fees collected under this section must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, for solar pollinator program special plates issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1642, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Agrivoltaics site management. new text end new text begin (a) An owner of a solar site implementing solar site management practices under this section may claim the site is an agrivoltaics site if the site is directly integrated with agricultural activities or conservation practices, including: new text end new text begin (1) crop production; new text end new text begin (2) rotational or conservation grazing; new text end new text begin (3) providing perennial vegetation for pollinator habitat and soil and water benefits under subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (4) production of agricultural commodities for sale in the retail or wholesale market; or new text end new text begin (5) any of the above practices together with other activities under this section to produce soil and water benefits. new text end new text begin (b) An owner making an agrivoltaics claim under this section must also provide the site's agrivoltaics management plan and management practices report for agency feedback in the manner described in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end